Montana, session 2025, HB814.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Reorganization of elementary and high school districts to form K-12
school districts -- timeline -- duty of county superintendents of schools. (1) The legislature intends that,
no later than July 1, 2029, elementary school districts must be reorganized with the high school district in which
they are located to form, except as provided in 20-6-701(4), a K-12 school district with a single contiguous
boundary.
(2) County superintendents of schools in collaboration with the school district trustees and
administrators of the county shall, no later than March 1, 2026, provide a report to the education interim
committee describing the county's plan for reorganization under subsection (1). The report must include:
(a) a description of existing school districts of the county, including:
(i) a list of operating schools with 20-year enrollment data; and
(ii) information regarding any territory of current school districts of the county that is noncontiguous
or within another county;
(b) a description of the size and makeup of the boards of trustees of the prospective reorganized
K-12 school districts of the county;
(c) any educationally relevant or financial concerns identified in developing the county's plan;
(d) a timeline for the reorganization; and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 814

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 814.1
(e) any other information the county superintendent considers relevant to provide to the education
interim committee.
(3) The education interim committee shall consider the reports and, if necessary, make
recommendations to the following legislature regarding any statutory changes required as part of the
reorganization under subsection (1).

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 20, chapter 6, part 4, and the provisions of Title 20, chapter 6, part 4, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 814